Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-319.01
Domestic companies; securities; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 44-319.01 to 44-319.13, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Director shall mean the Director of Insurance or his or her authorized representative;

(2) Policyholders shall mean all persons having a legal or equitable right against a depositing insurer or assessment association arising out of or by reason of depositing insurer's or association's policies and obligees under its surety contracts;

(3) State shall mean any state of the United States, the government of Puerto Rico, and the District of Columbia;

(4) Eligible securities shall mean the investments authorized under the Insurers Investment Act other than investments authorized under sections 44-5134, 44-5143 to 44-5145, 44-5149, 44-5152, and 44-5153, and unless otherwise provided by law, the values of such investments shall, for the purpose of sections 44-319.01 to 44-319.13, be an amount not exceeding the current market values thereof; and

(5) Insurer shall mean stock and mutual insurance companies and reciprocal exchanges.

Laws 1955, c. 174, § 1, p. 498;

Laws 1961, c. 210, § 3, p. 627;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 13, p. 1273;

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 58;

Laws 1997, LB 273, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1035, § 1.

Insurers Investment Act, see section 44-5101.